Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 14
FOSTER YOUTH FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

23-3.3-1401. Financial aid for students who have been in out-of-home placement - institution liaisons - navigators - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Chafee ETV grant" means an educational and training vouchers program grant made pursuant to the federal "John H. Chafee Foster Care Program for Successful Transition to Adulthood", 42 U.S.C. sec. 677.

"Cost of attendance" has the same meaning as set forth in section 23-3.3-1002.

"Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a state institution of higher education, as defined in section 23-18-102 (10)(a); local district college, as defined in section 23-71-102; or area technical college, as defined in section 23-60-103.

"Qualifying student" means a resident of Colorado who has been accepted for enrollment at an institution of higher education who:

Has been placed in foster care, as defined in section 19-1-103, in Colorado at any time on or after the student's thirteenth birthday; or

Has been in noncertified kinship care, as defined in section 19-1-103, in Colorado at any time on or after the student's thirteenth birthday and was, at any time, adjudicated neglected or dependent pursuant to article 3 of title 19.

Beginning in the 2022-23 academic year, each institution of higher education in the state shall provide financial assistance to a qualifying student for the remaining balance of the student's total cost of attendance in excess of the amount of any private, state, or federal financial assistance received by the student, referred to in this section as "remaining balance financial assistance", during the first one hundred thirty-two semester hours or one hundred ninety-eight quarter hours that the student is enrolled at the institution.

In order to receive remaining balance financial assistance, the qualifying student must:

Complete the free application for federal student aid, including, if applicable, acknowledging past or current foster care placement;

If eligible, complete the application for a Chafee ETV grant;

Be enrolled in courses leading toward a bachelor's degree, a postgraduate degree, an associate degree, or a certificate of completion at an institution of higher education;

Request the financial assistance in accordance with policies set forth by the institution; and

Remain in satisfactory academic standing in accordance with the academic policies of the institution and be making progress toward completion of the requirements of the educational program in which the student is enrolled.

The general assembly shall appropriate money to the commission to cover fifty percent of providing remaining balance financial assistance to qualifying students. Subject to available appropriations, the commission shall provide funding to an institution equal to fifty percent of the remaining balance financial assistance provided by the institution.

The commission shall promulgate rules necessary for the administration of this section.

Each institution shall designate one employee as a liaison to serve as a direct point of contact with the institution for qualifying students and prospective qualifying students. The liaison may have other duties unrelated to work as the liaison. The liaison shall provide qualifying students and prospective qualifying students with information regarding application assistance, financial assistance, support services, and other resources and assistance available to qualifying students and prospective qualifying students.

Each institution shall provide the foster care student navigators described in subsection (6) of this section with the contact information for the liaison.

The department of higher education shall designate four full-time equivalent employees as foster care student navigators to assist prospective qualifying students in applying for and enrolling in institutions of higher education. The navigators shall work with school district and state charter school institute child welfare education liaisons, described in section 22-32-138 (2), to identify prospective qualifying students. A navigator shall provide guidance to prospective qualifying students with selecting institutions and programs in which the student may want to enroll. A navigator shall, at the request of a student, assist the student with completing an institution's application for admission, the free application for federal student aid, and, if eligible, the application for a Chafee ETV grant.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-008), ch. 226, p. 1676, § 1, effective May 26.